Utah statutes.
16-6a-711.   Voting entitlement generally.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws:

(a)  only voting members may vote with respect to any matter required or permitted under this chapter to be submitted to a vote of the members;

(b)  all references in this chapter to votes of or voting by the members permit voting only by the voting members; and

(c)  voting members may vote with respect to all matters required or permitted under this chapter to be submitted to a vote of the members.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided by the articles of incorporation, each member entitled to vote may cast:

(a)  one vote on each matter submitted to a vote of members for nonprofit corporations other than those in Subsection (2)(b); and

(b)  one vote for each share held by the member on each matter submitted for a vote of members if the nonprofit corporation issues shares to its members.

(3)  Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, if a membership stands of record in the names of two or more persons, the membership's acts with respect to voting have the following effect:

(a) If only one votes, the act binds all of the persons whose membership is jointly held.

(b) If more than one votes, the vote is divided on a pro-rata basis.



Amended by Chapter 315, 2007 General Session

